Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 34.07.360.
Strict compliance with bylaws by apartment owner necessary.

Each apartment owner shall comply strictly with the bylaws and with the adopted administrative regulations, as either may be lawfully amended from time to time, and with the covenants, conditions, and restrictions set out in the declaration or in the deed to the apartment.
Failure to comply with any of the foregoing is ground for an action to recover sums due for damages or injunctive relief, or both, maintainable by the manager or board of directors on behalf of the association of apartment owners or by a particularly aggrieved apartment owner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.370.
Unanimous consent of all apartment owners needed for certain work on individual apartment.

An apartment owner may not do work that will jeopardize the soundness or safety of the property, reduce its value, or impair any easement or hereditament without the unanimous consent of all of the other apartment owners being first obtained.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.380.
Common profits and expenses shared by apartment owners.

The common profits of the property shall be distributed among and the common expenses shall be charged to the apartment owners according to the percentage of the undivided interest in the common areas and facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.390.
Persons subject to this chapter.

An apartment owner, a tenant, or their employees, or any other person that may in any manner use the property or any part of it under this chapter are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the declaration and bylaws of the association of apartment owners adopted under this chapter.

An agreement, decision, and determination made by the association of apartment owners under this chapter, the declaration, or the bylaws and in accordance with the voting percentages established under this chapter, declaration, or the bylaws is binding on all apartment owners.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.400.
Insurance of property.

A manager or board of directors, if required by the declaration, bylaws, or by a majority of the apartment owners, or if requested by a mortgagee or trustee having a mortgage or a deed of trust of record covering an apartment, shall obtain insurance for the property against loss or damage by fire and other hazards under the terms and amounts required or requested.

The insurance coverage shall be written on the property in the name of the manager or of the board of directors of the association of apartment owners, as trustee for each of the apartment owners in the percentages established by the declaration.

Premiums for insurance coverage secured under (a) of this section are a common expense.

Provision for insurance under this section does not prejudice the right of an apartment owner to insure the owner’s apartment or the personal contents in it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.410.
Liens against property, apartments, common areas, and facilities.

After the recording of the declaration as provided in this chapter, and while the property remains subject to this chapter, a lien may not arise or be effective against the property. During this period, liens or encumbrances may arise or be created only against each apartment and the percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities appurtenant to the apartment in the same manner and under the same conditions as liens or encumbrances may arise or be created upon or against any other separate parcel of real property subject to individual ownership. However, labor performed or materials furnished with the consent of or at the request of the owner of any apartment, or the owner’s agent, contractor, or subcontractor, may not be the basis for the filing of a lien against any other apartment or any other property of any other apartment owner not expressly consenting to or requesting the same. However, express consent is considered given by an apartment owner in the case of emergency repairs.

Labor performed or materials furnished for the common areas and facilities, if authorized as provided in this chapter, or by the declaration or bylaws, or by the association of apartment owners, the manager, or the board of directors, is considered performed or furnished with the express consent of each apartment owner and may be the basis for the filing of a lien against each of the apartments and is subject to the provisions of AS

34.07.420

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.420.
Removal of lien against two or more apartments.

If a lien against two or more apartments becomes effective, the apartment owners of the separate apartments may remove their apartments and the percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities appurtenant to the apartments from the lien by payment of the fractional or proportional amounts attributable to each of the apartments affected. The individual payments are computed by reference to the percentage appearing on the declaration.

After payment, discharge, or satisfaction of the lien, the apartment and the percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities appurtenant to it are free and clear of the liens paid, satisfied, or discharged. The partial payment, satisfaction, or discharge does not prevent the lienor from proceeding to enforce the lienor’s rights against any apartment and the percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities appurtenant to it not paid, satisfied, or discharged.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.430.
Assessment and taxation of apartments.

An apartment and its undivided interest in the common areas and facilities are a parcel and it is subject to separate assessments and taxation by each assessing unit for all types of taxes authorized by law including special ad valorem levies and special assessments. A building, property, or any of the common areas and facilities may not be a security or a parcel for any purpose.

Nothing in this chapter detracts from or limits the powers and duties of any assessing or taxing unit or official otherwise granted or imposed by law or regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.440.
Interpretation of local ordinances, resolutions, or zoning laws.

Local ordinances, resolutions, or laws relating to zoning shall be construed to treat like structures, lots, or parcels in like manner regardless of whether or not the ownership is divided by sale of apartments under this chapter rather than by lease of apartments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)